Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.070

Reportable contributions—Preelection limitations. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) It is a violation of this title for any person to make, or for any candidate or political committee to accept from any one person, contributions reportable under RCW 29B.25.100 in the aggregate exceeding fifty thousand dollars for any campaign for statewide office or exceeding five thousand dollars for any other campaign subject to the provisions of this title within 21 days of a general election. This subsection does not apply to:

(a) Contributions made by, or accepted from, a bona fide political party as defined in this title, excluding the county central committee or legislative district committee;

(b) Contributions made to, or received by, a ballot proposition committee; or

(c) Payments received by an incidental committee.

(2) Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to, contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as earmarked contributions under RCW 29B.25.150.

[ 2024 c 164 s 449; 2019 c 428 s 27; 2018 c 111 s 7; 2010 c 204 s 604. Formerly RCW 42.17A.420.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—Short title—Findings—Intent—Implementation with existing funds—2018 c 111: See notes following RCW 29B.25.030.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.